motorola-external-hunspell/motorola/external/hunspell/dicts/it_IT/it_IT.dic
abbarcare/ATXI
abbiosciare/AI
abborracciare/ATXI
abbronzare/ATXI
abdicare/ATXI
abusare/ATXI
accannellare/ATXI
accarpionare/ATXI
accattivare/ATXI
accentare/ATXI
acchiappare/ATXI
accigliare/ATXI
accoccare/ATXI
accompagnare/ATXI
accordare/ATXI
accozzare/ATXI
acetilare/ATI
acquistare/ATXI
addentare/ATXI
addolorare/ATXI
aderizzare/ATXI
adottare/ATXI
affaccendare/ATXqrI
affaticare/ATXqrI
affibbiare/ATXqrI
affiorare/ATXqrI
affrancare/ATXqrI
ageminare/ATXqrI
agghindare/ATXqrI
agglutinare/ATXqrI
aggregare/ATXJI
agguantare/AJTXI
alare/ATXI
aleggiare/ATXqrI
allagare/ATXqrI
allenare/ATXqrI
allignare/ATXqrI
allucinare/ATXqrI
altalenare/ATI
ambiare/ATXI
ammalare/ATXqrI
ammassare/ATXqrI
amministrare/ATXqrI
ammorbare/ATXqrI
amnistiare/ATXqrI
anatematizzare/ATXI
angariare/ATXqrI
annaspare/ATXqrI
annotare/ATXqrI
annuvolare/ATXqrI
antologizzare/ATXI
appaiare/ATXqrI
appassionare/JATXqrI
appianare/ATXqrI
appigliare/ATXqrI
appoppare/ATXI
approcciare/ATXqrI
approvvigionare/ATXqrI
arare/ATXqrI
areare/ATXqrI
armeggiare/ATXqrI
arrampicare/ATXqrI
arrenare/ATXqrI
arroccare/ATXqrI
arrotare/ATXqrI
arruffianare/ATqrI
ascoltare/ATXqrI
assaggiare/ATXqrI
assembrare/ATXqrI
assicurare/ATXqrI
assoggettare/ATXqrI
assordare/ATXqrI
attaccare/ATXqrI
attentare/ATXqrI
attivare/ATXqrI
attrappare/ATXqrI
augurare/ATXI
autoamministrare/ATqrI
autodenunciare/ATXqrI
autolegittimare/ATqrI
autosuggestionare/ATXqrI
avocare/ATXqrI
avverare/ATXqrI
avvinare/ATXqrI
avvivare/ATXqrI
azzerare/ATXqrI
baccheggiare/AI
balbettare/AI
baloccare/AI
baraccare/AI
barbugliare/AI
barrare/AI
batacchiare/AI
beccheggiare/AI
belare/AI
bersagliare/AI
biffare/AI
biondeggiare/AI
bisognare/AI
biutare/AI
boccheggiare/AI
bolzonare/AI
boriare/AI
bracciare/AI
braveggiare/AI
brindare/AI
bruciare/AI
bucherare/AI
bulinare/AI
buscare/AI
cabrare/AI
calandrare/AI
caldeggiare/AI
cambiare/AI
cancellare/AI
canterellare/AI
capitalizzare/AI
cappottare/AI
carbonizzare/AI
carotare/AI
cassare/AI
cateterizzare/AI
cavare/AI
censurare/AI
cercare/AI
chiamare/AI
cianciare/AI
cigolare/AI
circolare/AYI
civilizzare/AI
clorurare/AI
cofinanziare/AI
collaudare/AI
colluttare/AI
comminare/AI
complessare/AI
concettualizzare/AI
confabulare/AI
congedare/AI
connumerare/AI
contabilizzare/AI
contraddatare/AI
controsterzare/AI
cornificare/AI
costellare/AI
criminalizzare/AI
cubare/AI
deamplificare/AI
decentralizzare/AI
deconficcare/AI
defecare/AI
degassificare/AI
delineare/AI
denaturare/AI
depenalizzare/AI
deprivare/AI
desegregare/AI
deteriorare/AI
dialogare/AI
dilaniare/AI
dimorare/AI
disaggregare/AI
disattivare/AI
diseducare/AI
disincarnare/AI
disistimare/AI
disputare/AI
dissimulare/AI
divaricare/AI
domare/AI
dribblare/AI
educare/ATXqrI
elettrolizzare/ATI
encomiare/ATXqrI
equiparare/ATXqrI
esaltare/ATXJqrI
esiliare/ATXqrI
esplorare/ATXqrI
estraniare/ATXqrI
evacuare/ATXqrI
fallare/AI
favellare/AI
festeggiare/AI
filettare/AI
fistulare/AI
folleggiare/AI
forzare/AI
frantumare/AI
frisare/AI
fugare/AI
galleggiare/AI
gelare/AI
gessificare/AI
giocare/AI
giurare/AI
gongolare/AI
granare/AI
gridare/AI
handicappare/ATI
illuminare/ATXqrI
imbiaccare/ATXI
imbragare/ATXI
imbustare/ATXqrI
impacchettare/ATXqrI
impappinare/ATXqrI
impeciare/ATXqrI
impetrare/ATXqrI
impipare/ATXqrI
impossibilitare/ATXqrI
impupare/AI
incacare/ATXqrI
incappare/ATXqrI
incasellare/ATXqrI
incavolare/ATXqrI
incettare/ATXqrI
incollare/ATXqrI
incrementare/ATXqrI
indebitare/ATXI
indossare/ATXqrI
infettare/ATXqrI
infirmare/ATXqrI
infossare/ATXqrI
ingegnare/ATXqrI
ingollare/ATXqrI
inguaiare/ATXqrI
innevare/ATXqrI
insaponare/ATXI
instradare/ATXqrI
integrare/ATXqrI
interpellare/ATXqrI
intoppare/ATXqrI
intronare/ATXqrI
inventare/ATXqrI
invogliare/ATXqrI
ipotizzare/ATXqrI
ispirare/ATXqrI
laicizzare/AI
latrare/AI
lesinare/AI
limare/AI
logorare/AI
macchinare/AI
maltrattare/AI
marchiare/AI
maschiettare/AI
mattinare/AI
meravigliare/AI
metaforizzare/AI
militarizzare/AI
mirare/AI
moccicare/AI
monetizzare/AI
mortificare/AI
musicare/AI
necrotizzare/AI
nitratare/AI
nuotare/AI
odiare/ATXqrI
ondeggiare/ATXqrI
organicare/ATXqrI
osculare/ATXI
ottanizzare/ATXqrI
pacchettizzare/AI
palleggiare/AI
paragonare/AI
parlare/AI
pastificare/AI
pavesare/AI
pendolare/ASI
perforare/AI
personalizzare/AI
pianificare/AI
pignorare/AI
pirografare/AI
plastificare/AI
pompare/AI
postare/AI
preannunziare/AI
preformare/AI
preriscaldare/AI
prillare/AI
professare/AI
promozionare/AI
prospettare/AI
pugnare/AI
quadrettare/AI
rabboccare/AI
raccontare/AI
radiocomandare/AI
raffrenare/AI
raggrovigliare/AI
ramificare/AI
rannicchiare/AI
raschiettare/AI
ratificare/AI
razzolare/AI
refilare/AI
reimpostare/AI
reiterare/AI
resinare/AI
riabbandonare/AI
riaccusare/AI
riaffrontare/AI
riappacificare/AI
riassettare/AI
ribellare/AI
ricanalizzare/AI
ricominciare/AI
riconquistare/AI
ridare/AI
rieccitare/AI
rifermare/AI
rifugiare/AI
riguastare/AI
rimarcare/AI
rimediare/AI
rimpalmare/AI
rimunerare/AI
rincrespare/AI
rinfrancare/AI
rinsanicare/AI
rinvangare/AI
ripassare/AI
riprincipiare/AI
riscaldare/AI
risocializzare/AI
rissare/AI
risvegliare/AI
riutilizzare/AI
rizzare/AI
roteare/AI
rutilare/AI
salare/AI
salutare/AI
satireggiare/AI
sbaraccare/AI
sbendare/AI
sborrare/AI
sbreccare/AI
sbudellare/AI
scagnare/AI
scalvare/AI
scantinare/AI
scardinare/AI
scartellare/AI
scentrare/AI
schiattare/AI
sciallare/AI
scivolare/AI
scombinare/AI
sconfinare/AI
scoppiare/AI
scotolare/AI
scrosciare/AI
sdoganare/AI
segregare/AI
sequestrare/AI
seviziare/AI
sfatare/AI
sfiduciare/AI
sfondare/AI
sfrondare/AI
sghignazzare/AI
sgraffiare/AI
sgrossare/AI
sillabare/AI
sinterizzare/AI
sloggiare/AI
smarginare/AI
sminuzzolare/AI
snebbiare/AI
soffiare/AI
solennizzare/AI
soluzionare/AI
sopportare/AI
soqquadrare/AI
sottoalimentare/AI
sovraffaticare/AI
spaginare/AI
spappagallare/AI
spazzare/AI
sperare/AI
speziare/AI
spidocchiare/AI
spiralizzare/AI
spollonare/AI
sprezzare/AI
spumeggiare/AI
squartare/AI
staffilare/AI
stappare/AI
stempiare/AI
stimare/AI
stornellare/AI
stralunare/AI
strascinare/AI
stringare/AI
strumentalizzare/AI
subdelegare/AI
sudare/AI
suppurare/AI
svalutare/AI
svergolare/AI
sviscerare/AI
tacciare/AI
tappezzare/AI
tatuare/AI
telematizzare/AI
tentennare/AI
terzarolare/AI
timbrare/AI
tonare/AI
torturare/AI
tracollare/AI
tramezzare/AI
trapelare/AI
trasmigrare/AI
travalicare/AI
trimestralizzare/AI
troncare/AI
tubercolizzare/AI
ubicare/ATXqrI
unificare/ATXqrI
vaccinare/AJI
vantare/AI
venare/AI
versificare/AI
villeggiare/AI
vitaminizzare/AI
volatizzare/AI
zampettare/AI
zufolare/AI
